Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 29. Agricultural Council.

§ 3.2-2900.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Farmers”
shall include all producers of agricultural products such as cotton, tobacco, peanuts, soybeans, potatoes, vegetables, fruits, livestock, livestock products, poultry and turkeys, any other agricultural products having domestic and foreign markets, and all nursery, horticultural, or floricultural products.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-16.7; 1966, c. 536, § 3.1-22.3; 1968, c. 85; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2901.
Agricultural Council; composition and appointment of members.

The Agricultural Council is continued within the executive branch of state government. The Agricultural Council shall consist of 18 members to be appointed by the Governor. Insofar as practical, 15 members shall be actively engaged in farming and shall be primarily engaged in the production of a different agricultural commodity. The Commissioner, the dean of the College of Agriculture and Life Sciences of Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University, and the Associate Vice President for Agriculture and Extension of Virginia State University shall serve as members ex officio.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-16.8; 1966, c. 536, § 3.1-22.4; 1979, c. 69; 1984, c. 734; 1985, cc. 146, 448; 1992, c. 121; 2004, c. 650; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2902.
Agricultural Council membership terms.

The terms for appointments to the Agricultural Council shall run concurrently with the term of the Governor making the appointment, but vacancies occurring before the expiration of term shall be filled for the unexpired term.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-16.8; 1966, c. 536, § 3.1-22.4; 1979, c. 69; 1984, c. 734; 1985, cc. 146, 448; 1992, c. 121; 2004, c. 650; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2903.
Agricultural Council officers and compensation.

The Agricultural Council shall elect from its membership a chairman, vice-chairman, and such other officers as it deems appropriate.

Members of the Agricultural Council shall be paid their necessary traveling expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their duties. Such compensation and expenses shall be paid from the Virginia Agricultural Foundation Fund.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-16.8; 1966, c. 536, § 3.1-22.4; 1979, c. 69; 1984, c. 734; 1985, cc. 146, 448; 1992, c. 121; 2004, c. 650; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2904.
Powers and duties of the Agricultural Council.

The Agricultural Council shall have charge of the management and expenditure of the Virginia Agricultural Foundation Fund. The Agricultural Council may expend funds to provide for programs of agricultural research and education and agricultural services; manage the fund so as to accumulate a reserve for contingencies; establish an office and employ such technical, professional, and other assistants as may be required, subject to the provisions of the Virginia Personnel Act (§

2.2-2900

et seq.); contract for research and other services; and take all such measures as will assist in strengthening and promoting the best interests of agriculture in the Commonwealth.

The chairman shall submit an annual report to the members, the Governor, and the General Assembly on or before November 1 of each year. The report shall contain the annual financial statements of the Agricultural Council for the year ending the preceding June 30.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-16.8; 1966, c. 536, § 3.1-22.4; 1979, c. 69; 1984, c. 734; 1985, cc. 146, 448; 1992, c. 121; 2004, c. 650; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2905.
Virginia Agricultural Foundation Fund established.

There is hereby established in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be designated as the Virginia Agricultural Foundation Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All transfers made to the Fund under §§

3.2-3617

,

3.2-3710

,

3.2-4004

,

3.2-4814

,

58.1-2259

, and

58.1-2289

, other moneys appropriated thereto, gifts and grants, and interest accruing thereon shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. The Fund shall be expended in accordance with the directions of the Agricultural Council and drawn from the state treasury in the manner provided by law.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-16.9; 1966, c. 536, § 3.1-22.5; 1970, c. 457; 1976, c. 91; 1994, cc. 577, 649, 740, 743; 2008, c. 860.